Nebraska, session 109, LB1133.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. The following sum of money, or so much thereof as may be
required, is hereby appropriated from the General Fund or from other funds as
indicated in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, for the payment of
state settlements, which have been settled by the Attorney General in the
district court and which require the approval of the Legislature for payment.
$51,791.88 for Miscellaneous Claim Number 2025-01061, pay to Rodney Gerald
Hoelscher, 1860 Road 43, Linwood, NE 68036, out of the General Fund.
$289,360.48 for Line of Duty Claim Number 2026-01453, against the State of
Nebraska, for Kyle McAcy who died in the Line of Duty, pay to Kevin and Teresa
McAcy, 1224 South 167th Street, Omaha, NE 68130, out of the General Fund.
The claims included in this section shall be paid through Program 536 in
Agency 65.
For informational purposes only, the appropriation contained in this
section and fund source:
FUND SOURCE DOLLAR AMOUNT
GENERAL FUND $341,152.36
CASH FUND $-0-
REVOLVING FUND $-0-
TOTAL $341,152.36
Sec. 2. The following sum of money, or so much thereof as may be
required, is hereby appropriated from the General Fund or from other funds as
indicated in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, for the payment of
indemnification claims which have been settled by the State Claims Board and
approved by the district court, which have been settled by the Attorney General
in the district court, or in which a court judgment has been entered and which
require the approval of the Legislature for payment.
$354,456.23 for Indemnification Claim Numbers CI 24-3163 and CI 24-4457,
pay to the Trust Account of Fiedler Law Firm, P.L.C., on behalf of Kurt Von
Minden, 17330 Wright Street, Suite 102, Omaha, NE 68130, out of the General
Fund.
The claim included in this section shall be paid through Program 592 in
Agency 65.
For informational purposes only, the appropriation contained in this
section and fund source:
FUND SOURCE DOLLAR AMOUNT
GENERAL FUND $354,456.23
CASH FUND $-0-
REVOLVING FUND $-0-
TOTAL $354,456.23
Sec. 3. The following sums of money, or so much thereof as may be
required, are hereby appropriated from the General Fund or from other funds as
indicated in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, for the payment of
workers' compensation claims which have been settled by the Attorney General in
the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court or in which court judgments have been
entered and which require the approval of the Legislature for payment.
$400,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
High & Younes, LLC, on behalf of Greg Mosley, 6919 Dodge Street, Omaha, NE
68132, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund.
$162,500.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Atwood Law, P.C., L.L.O., on behalf of Stewart Craig, 575 Fallbrook Boulevard,
Suite 206, Lincoln, NE 68521, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving
Fund.
$20,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Handley Law, PC, LLO, on behalf of Kenneth Cobb, 1141 H Street, Lincoln, NE
68508, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund.
-1-

LB1133 LB1133
2026 2026
$300,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Keating, O'Gara, Nedved & Peter, PC, LLO, on behalf of Todd Rasmussen, PO Box
82248, Lincoln, NE 68501-2248, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims
Revolving Fund.
$110,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Keating, O'Gara, Nedved & Peter, PC, LLO, on behalf of Anthony O. Dix, Jr., PO
Box 82248, Lincoln, NE 68501-2248, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims
Revolving Fund.
$125,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Friedman Law Offices, PC, LLO, on behalf of Tina Vaughn, PO Box 82009, Lincoln,
NE 68501, out of the Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund.
$50,000.00 for a workers' compensation claim, pay to the Trust Account of
Gallner & Pattermann, P.C., on behalf of Tiffany Colvin (now known as Tiffany
Mills), 300 West Broadway, Suite 145, Council Bluffs, IA 51503, out of the
Workers' Compensation Claims Revolving Fund.
The claims included in this section shall be paid through Program 593 in
Agency 65.
For informational purposes only, the appropriations contained in this
section and fund source:
FUND SOURCE DOLLAR AMOUNT
GENERAL FUND $-0-
CASH FUND $-0-
REVOLVING FUND $1,167,500.00
TOTAL $1,167,500.00
Sec. 4. The Director of Administrative Services is hereby authorized and
directed to draw his or her warrants upon the funds in the state treasury
enumerated in this act, in favor of the several beneficiaries named in this act
for the amount set opposite their respective names, upon the presentation of
proper vouchers therefor. The several amounts appropriated in this act shall be
in full payment of any and all claims, rights, causes of action, damages, and
demands of every character and kind owing by or against the State of Nebraska,
its officers, agents, and employees, and their successors and assigns with
respect to each of the beneficiaries respectively in whose favor the
appropriations are made. The director shall not deliver any warrant for any
items appropriated in this act until a receipt and release in full, releasing
the State of Nebraska, its officers, employees, and agents, and their
successors and assigns, has been filed by each of the beneficiaries
respectively. Upon presentation of the warrants, the State Treasurer is hereby
directed to pay the same out of money in the General Fund or out of money in
other funds indicated in this act not otherwise appropriated.
Sec. 5. The following requests were filed by state agencies seeking
permission to write off certain accounts. The State Claims Board reviewed and
approved the following requests:
$856.00 for Request Number 2026-01512, made by the State Fire Marshal.
$1,032,144.79 for Request Number 2026-01520, made by the Department of
Health and Human Services.
$98,759.21 for Request Number 2026-01521, made by the Department of
Transportation.
$1,708,343.43 for Request Number 2026-01524, made by the Department of
Labor.
$2,647.70 for Request Number 2026-01526, made by the Department of
Veterans' Affairs.
Sec. 6. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-2-